Ohio, session 136, SB471.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 2301.02 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 2301.02. The number of judges of the court of common pleas for each county, the time for the next election of the judges in the several counties, and the beginning of their terms shall be as follows: (A) In Ashland, Fayette, and Pike counties, one judge, elected in 1956, term to begin February 9, 1957; In Brown, Crawford, Defiance, Highland, Holmes, Morgan, Ottawa, and Union counties, one judge, to be elected in 1954, term to begin February 9, 1955; In Auglaize county, one judge, to be elected in 1956, term to begin January 9, 1957; In Coshocton, Darke, Fulton, Gallia, Guernsey, Jackson, Knox, Madison, Mercer, Monroe, Paulding, Vinton, and Wyandot counties, one judge, to be elected in 1956, term to begin January 1, 1957; In Morrow county, two judges, one to be elected in 1956, term to begin January 1, 1957, and one to be elected in 2006, term to begin January 1, 2007; In Logan county, two judges, one to be elected in 1956, term to begin January 1, 1957, and one to be elected in 2004, term to begin January 2, 2005; In Carroll, Clinton, Hocking, Meigs, Pickaway, Preble, Shelby, Van Wert, and Williams counties, one judge, to be elected in 1952, term to begin January 1, 1953; In Champaign county, two judges, one to be elected in 1952, term to begin January 1, 1953, and one to be elected in 2008, term to begin February 10, 2009; In Harrison and Noble counties, one judge, to be elected in 1954, term to begin April 18, 1955; In Henry county, two judges, one to be elected in 1956, term to begin May 9, 1957, and one to be elected in 2004, term to begin January 1, 2005; In Putnam county, one judge, to be elected in 1956, term to begin May 9, 1957; In Huron county, one judge, to be elected in 1952, term to begin May 14, 1953; In Perry county, one judge, to be elected in 1954, term to begin July 6, 1956; In Sandusky county, two judges, one to be elected in 1954, term to begin February 10, 1955, and one to be elected in 1978, term to begin January 1, 1979; In Hardin County, two judges, one to be elected in 1956, term to begin January 1, 1957, and one to be elected in 2026, term to begin February 9, 2027; In Adams county, two judges, one to be elected in 1956, term to begin February 9, 1957, and one to be elected in 2026, term to begin February 9, 2027. (B) In Allen county, three judges, one to be elected in 1956, term to begin February 9, 1957, the second to be elected in 1958, term to begin January 1, 1959, and the third to be elected in 1992, term to begin January 1, 1993; In Ashtabula county, three judges, one to be elected in 1954, term to begin February 9, 1955, one to be elected in 1960, term to begin January 1, 1961, and one to be elected in 1978, term to begin January 2, 1979; In Athens county, two judges, one to be elected in 1954, term to begin February 9, 1955, and one to be elected in 1990, term to begin July 1, 1991; In Erie county, four judges, one to be elected in 1956, term to begin January 1, 1957, the second to be elected in 1970, term to begin January 2, 1971, the third to be elected in 2004, term to begin January 2, 2005, and the fourth to be elected in 2008, term to begin February 9, 2009; In Fairfield county, three judges, one to be elected in 1954, term to begin February 9, 1955, the second to be elected in 1970, term to begin January 1, 1971, and the third to be elected in 1994, term to begin January 2, 1995; In Geauga county, two judges, one to be elected in 1956, term to begin January 1, 1957, and the second to be elected in 1976, term to begin January 6, 1977; In Greene county, four judges, one to be elected in 1956, term to begin February 9, 1957, the second to be elected in 1960, term to begin January 1, 1961, the third to be elected in 1978, term to begin January 2, 1979, and the fourth to be elected in 1994, term to begin January 1, 1995; In Hancock county, two judges, one to be elected in 1952, term to begin January 1, 1953, and the second to be elected in 1978, term to begin January 1, 1979; In Lawrence county, two judges, one to be elected in 1954, term to begin February 9, 1955, and the second to be elected in 1976, term to begin January 1, 1977; In Marion county, three judges, one to be elected in 1952, term to begin January 1, 1953, the second to be elected in 1976, term to begin January 2, 1977, and the third to be elected in 1998, term to begin February 9, 1999; In Medina county, three judges, one to be elected in 1956, term to begin January 1, 1957, the second to be elected in 1966, term to begin January 1, 1967, and the third to be elected in 1994, term to begin January 1, 1995; In Miami county, two judges, one to be elected in 1954, term to begin February 9, 1955, and one to be elected in 1970, term to begin on January 1, 1971; In Muskingum county, three judges, one to be elected in 1968, term to begin August 9, 1969, one to be elected in 1978, term to begin January 1, 1979, and one to be elected in 2002, term to begin January 2, 2003; In Portage county, three judges, one to be elected in 1956, term to begin January 1, 1957, the second to be elected in 1960, term to begin January 1, 1961, and the third to be elected in 1986, term to begin January 2, 1987; In Ross county, two judges, one to be elected in 1956, term to begin February 9, 1957, and the second to be elected in 1976, term to begin January 1, 1977; In Scioto county, three judges, one to be elected in 1954, term to begin February 10, 1955, the second to be elected in 1960, term to begin January 1, 1961, and the third to be elected in 1994, term to begin January 2, 1995; In Seneca county, two judges, one to be elected in 1956, term to begin January 1, 1957, and the second to be elected in 1986, term to begin January 2, 1987; In Warren county, four judges, one to be elected in 1954, term to begin February 9, 1955, the second to be elected in 1970, term to begin January 1, 1971, the third to be elected in 1986, term to begin January 1, 1987, and the fourth to be elected in 2004, term to begin January 2, 2005; In Washington county, two judges, one to be elected in 1952, term to begin January 1, 1953, and one to be elected in 1986, term to begin January 1, 1987; In Wood county, three judges, one to be elected in 1968, term beginning January 1, 1969, the second to be elected in 1970, term to begin January 2, 1971, and the third to be elected in 1990, term to begin January 1, 1991; In Belmont and Jefferson counties, two judges, to be elected in 1954, terms to begin January 1, 1955, and February 9, 1955, respectively; In Clark county, four judges, one to be elected in 1952, term to begin January 1, 1953, the second to be elected in 1956, term to begin January 2, 1957, the third to be elected in 1986, term to begin January 3, 1987, and the fourth to be elected in 1994, term to begin January 2, 1995; In Clermont county, five judges, one to be elected in 1956, term to begin January 1, 1957, the second to be elected in 1964, term to begin January 1, 1965, the third to be elected in 1982, term to begin January 2, 1983, the fourth to be elected in 1986, term to begin January 2, 1987, and the fifth to be elected in 2006, term to begin January 3, 2007; In Columbiana county, two judges, one to be elected in 1952, term to begin January 1, 1953, and the second to be elected in 1956, term to begin January 1, 1957; In Delaware county, three judges, one to be elected in 1990, term to begin February 9, 1991, the second to be elected in 1994, term to begin January 1, 1995, and the third to be elected in 2016, term to begin January 1, 2017; In Lake county, six judges, one to be elected in 1958, term to begin January 1, 1959, the second to be elected in 1960, term to begin January 2, 1961, the third to be elected in 1964, term to begin January 3, 1965, the fourth and fifth to be elected in 1978, terms to begin January 4, 1979, and January 5, 1979, respectively, and the sixth to be elected in 2000, term to begin January 6, 2001; In Licking county, four judges, one to be elected in 1954, term to begin February 9, 1955, one to be elected in 1964, term to begin January 1, 1965, one to be elected in 1990, term to begin January 1, 1991, and one to be elected in 2004, term to begin January 1, 2005; In Lorain county, nine judges, two to be elected in 1952, terms to begin January 1, 1953, and January 2, 1953, respectively, one to be elected in 1958, term to begin January 3, 1959, one to be elected in 1968, term to begin January 1, 1969, two to be elected in 1988, terms to begin January 4, 1989, and January 5, 1989, respectively, two to be elected in 1998, terms to begin January 2, 1999, and January 3, 1999, respectively; and one to be elected in 2006, term to begin January 6, 2007; In Butler county, eleven judges, one to be elected in 1956, term to begin January 1, 1957; two to be elected in 1954, terms to begin January 1, 1955, and February 9, 1955, respectively; one to be elected in 1968, term to begin January 2, 1969; one to be elected in 1986, term to begin January 3, 1987; two to be elected in 1988, terms to begin January 1, 1989, and January 2, 1989, respectively; one to be elected in 1992, term to begin January 4, 1993; two to be elected in 2002, terms to begin January 2, 2003, and January 3, 2003, respectively; and one to be elected in 2006, term to begin January 3, 2007; In Richland county, four judges, one to be elected in 1956, term to begin January 1, 1957, the second to be elected in 1960, term to begin February 9, 1961, the third to be elected in 1968, term to begin January 2, 1969, and the fourth to be elected in 2004, term to begin January 3, 2005; In Tuscarawas county, two judges, one to be elected in 1956, term to begin January 1, 1957, and the second to be elected in 1960, term to begin January 2, 1961; In Wayne county, two judges, one to be elected in 1956, term beginning January 1, 1957, and one to be elected in 1968, term to begin January 2, 1969; In Trumbull county, six judges, one to be elected in 1952, term to begin January 1, 1953, the second to be elected in 1954, term to begin January 1, 1955, the third to be elected in 1956, term to begin January 1, 1957, the fourth to be elected in 1964, term to begin January 1, 1965, the fifth to be elected in 1976, term to begin January 2, 1977, and the sixth to be elected in 1994, term to begin January 3, 1995; (C) In Cuyahoga county, thirty-nine judges; eight to be elected in 1954, terms to begin on successive days beginning from January 1, 1955, to January 7, 1955, and February 9, 1955, respectively; eight to be elected in 1956, terms to begin on successive days beginning from January 1, 1957, to January 8, 1957; three to be elected in 1952, terms to begin from January 1, 1953, to January 3, 1953; two to be elected in 1960, terms to begin on January 8, 1961, and January 9, 1961, respectively; two to be elected in 1964, terms to begin January 4, 1965, and January 5, 1965, respectively; one to be elected in 1966, term to begin on January 10, 1967; four to be elected in 1968, terms to begin on successive days beginning from January 9, 1969, to January 12, 1969; two to be elected in 1974, terms to begin on January 18, 1975, and January 19, 1975, respectively; five to be elected in 1976, terms to begin on successive days beginning January 6, 1977, to January 10, 1977; two to be elected in 1982, terms to begin January 11, 1983, and January 12, 1983, respectively; and two to be elected in 1986, terms to begin January 13, 1987, and January 14, 1987, respectively; In Franklin county, twenty-four twenty-six judges; two to be elected in 1954, terms to begin January 1, 1955, and February 9, 1955, respectively; four to be elected in 1956, terms to begin January 1, 1957, to January 4, 1957; four to be elected in 1958, terms to begin January 1, 1959, to January 4, 1959; three to be elected in 1968, terms to begin January 5, 1969, to January 7, 1969; three to be elected in 1976, terms to begin on successive days beginning January 5, 1977, to January 7, 1977; one to be elected in 1982, term to begin January 8, 1983; one to be elected in 1986, term to begin January 9, 1987; two to be elected in 1990, terms to begin July 1, 1991, and July 2, 1991, respectively; one to be elected in 1996, term to begin January 2, 1997; one to be elected in 2004, term to begin July 1, 2005; one to be elected in 2018, term to begin January 9, 2019; and one to be elected in 2020, term to begin January 3, 2021; and two to be elected in 2028, terms to begin February 1, 2029, and February 5, 2029, respectively; In Hamilton county, twenty-one judges; eight to be elected in 1966, terms to begin January 1, 1967, January 2, 1967, and from February 9, 1967, to February 14, 1967, respectively; five to be elected in 1956, terms to begin from January 1, 1957, to January 5, 1957; one to be elected in 1964, term to begin January 1, 1965; one to be elected in 1974, term to begin January 15, 1975; one to be elected in 1980, term to begin January 16, 1981; two to be elected at large in the general election in 1982, terms to begin April 1, 1983; one to be elected in 1990, term to begin July 1, 1991; and two to be elected in 1996, terms to begin January 3, 1997, and January 4, 1997, respectively; In Lucas county, fourteen judges; two to be elected in 1954, terms to begin January 1, 1955, and February 9, 1955, respectively; two to be elected in 1956, terms to begin January 1, 1957, and October 29, 1957, respectively; two to be elected in 1952, terms to begin January 1, 1953, and January 2, 1953, respectively; one to be elected in 1964, term to begin January 3, 1965; one to be elected in 1968, term to begin January 4, 1969; two to be elected in 1976, terms to begin January 4, 1977, and January 5, 1977, respectively; one to be elected in 1982, term to begin January 6, 1983; one to be elected in 1988, term to begin January 7, 1989; one to be elected in 1990, term to begin January 2, 1991; and one to be elected in 1992, term to begin January 2, 1993; In Mahoning county, seven judges; three to be elected in 1954, terms to begin January 1, 1955, January 2, 1955, and February 9, 1955, respectively; one to be elected in 1956, term to begin January 1, 1957; one to be elected in 1952, term to begin January 1, 1953; one to be elected in 1968, term to begin January 2, 1969; and one to be elected in 1990, term to begin July 1, 1991; In Montgomery county, fifteen judges; three to be elected in 1954, terms to begin January 1, 1955, January 2, 1955, and January 3, 1955, respectively; four to be elected in 1952, terms to begin January 1, 1953, January 2, 1953, July 1, 1953, and July 2, 1953, respectively; one to be elected in 1964, term to begin January 3, 1965; one to be elected in 1968, term to begin January 3, 1969; three to be elected in 1976, terms to begin on successive days beginning January 4, 1977, to January 6, 1977; two to be elected in 1990, terms to begin July 1, 1991, and July 2, 1991, respectively; and one to be elected in 1992, term to begin January 1, 1993; In Stark county, eight judges; one to be elected in 1958, term to begin on January 2, 1959; two to be elected in 1954, terms to begin on January 1, 1955, and February 9, 1955, respectively; two to be elected in 1952, terms to begin January 1, 1953, and April 16, 1953, respectively; one to be elected in 1966, term to begin on January 4, 1967; and two to be elected in 1992, terms to begin January 1, 1993, and January 2, 1993, respectively; In Summit county, thirteen judges; four to be elected in 1954, terms to begin January 1, 1955, January 2, 1955, January 3, 1955, and February 9, 1955, respectively; three to be elected in 1958, terms to begin January 1, 1959, January 2, 1959, and May 17, 1959, respectively; one to be elected in 1966, term to begin January 4, 1967; one to be elected in 1968, term to begin January 5, 1969; one to be elected in 1990, term to begin May 1, 1991; one to be elected in 1992, term to begin January 6, 1993; and two to be elected in 2008, terms to begin January 5, 2009, and January 6, 2009, respectively. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, in any county having two or more judges of the court of common pleas, in which more than one-third of the judges plus one were previously elected at the same election, if the office of one of those judges so elected becomes vacant more than forty days prior to the second general election preceding the expiration of that judge's term, the office that that judge had filled shall be abolished as of the date of the next general election, and a new office of judge of the court of common pleas shall be created. The judge who is to fill that new office shall be elected for a six-year term at the next general election, and the term of that judge shall commence on the first day of the year following that general election, on which day no other judge's term begins, so that the number of judges that the county shall elect shall not be reduced. Judges of the probate division of the court of common pleas are judges of the court of common pleas but shall be elected pursuant to sections 2101.02 and 2101.021 of the Revised Code, except in Harrison, Henry, Morgan, Noble, and Wyandot counties in which the judge of the court of common pleas elected pursuant to this section also shall serve as judge of the probate division, except in Lorain county in which the judges of the domestic relations division of the Lorain county court of common pleas elected pursuant to this section also shall perform the duties and functions of the judge of the probate division from February 9, 2009, through September 28, 2009, and except in Morrow county in which the judges of the court of common pleas elected pursuant to this section also shall perform the duties and functions of the judge of the probate division. Section 2. That existing section 2301.02 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.